utilities/dictionaries/ltg_LTG-Latgalian.aff
#SFX g t    tūs    imt  is:0dtav   # vielejuma izt.
#SFX g imt  emūtīs imt  is:0xtaa   # atst. izteiksme

SFX g Y 93
SFX g t  ūs   [bpļr]t  is:1vta0
SFX g t  īs   [bpr]t   is:2vta0
SFX g t  ās   [bpļr]t  is:3xta0
SFX g t  amēs [bpļr]t  is:1dta0
SFX g t  atēs [bpļr]t  is:2dta0
SFX g t  itēs [bpr]t   is:2dtap
SFX g t  tūs  [bp]t    is:0dtav
SFX g t  ūtīs [bpļr]t  is:0xtaa
SFX g ļt līs     ļt  is:0xta0
SFX g ļt litēs   ļt  is:2dtap
SFX g aļt oltūs aļt  is:0dtav
SFX g eļt altūs eļt  is:0dtav
SFX g ert artūs ert  is:0dtav
SFX g t  ūs   [^i]mt  is:1vta0
SFX g t  īs   [^i]mt  is:2vta0
SFX g t  ās   [^i]mt  is:3xta0
SFX g t  amēs [^i]mt  is:1dta0
SFX g t  atēs [^i]mt  is:2dta0
SFX g t  itēs [^i]mt  is:2dtap
SFX g t  tūs  [^i]mt  is:0dtav
SFX g t  ūtīs [^i]mt  is:0xtaa
SFX g st žūs   [^y][^u]st  is:1vta0
SFX g st dīs   [^y][^u]st  is:2vta0
SFX g st žās   [^y][^u]st  is:3xta0
SFX g st žamēs [^y][^u]st  is:1dta0
SFX g st žatēs [^y][^u]st  is:2dta0
SFX g st ditēs [^y][^u]st  is:2dtap
SFX g st stūs  [^y][^u]st  is:0dtav
SFX g st žūtīs [^y][^u]st  is:0xtaa
SFX g st žūs   [^y]ust  is:1vta0
SFX g st dīs   [^y]ust  is:2vta0
SFX g st žās   [^y]ust  is:3xta0
SFX g st žamēs [^y]ust  is:1dta0
SFX g st žatēs [^y]ust  is:2dta0
SFX g st ditēs [^y]ust  is:2dtap
SFX g st stūs  [^y]ust  is:0dtav
SFX g st žūtīs [^y]ust  is:0xtaa
SFX g st šūs    [y]ust  is:1vta0
SFX g st tīs    [y]ust  is:2vta0
SFX g st šās    [y]ust  is:3xta0
SFX g st šamēs  [y]ust  is:1dta0
SFX g st šatēs  [y]ust  is:2dta0
SFX g st titēs  [y]ust  is:2dtap
SFX g st stūs   [y]ust  is:0dtav
SFX g st šūtīs  [y]ust  is:0xtaa
SFX g t  jūs   uot  is:1vta0
SFX g t  jīs   uot  is:2vta0
SFX g t  jās   uot  is:3xta0
SFX g t  jamēs uot  is:1dta0
SFX g t  jatēs uot  is:2dta0
SFX g t  jitēs uot  is:2dtap
SFX g t  tūs   uot  is:0dtav
SFX g t  jūtīs uot  is:0xtaa
SFX g it  jūs   [^z]eit  is:1vta0
SFX g it  jīs   [^z]eit  is:0xta0
SFX g it  jās   [^z]eit  is:0xta0
SFX g it  jamēs [^z]eit  is:1dta0
SFX g it  jatēs [^z]eit  is:2dta0
SFX g it  jitēs [^z]eit  is:2dtap
SFX g t   tūs   [^z]eit  is:0dtav
SFX g it  jūtīs [^z]eit  is:0xtaa
SFX g eit anūs   [z]eit  is:1vta0
SFX g eit enīs   [z]eit  is:2vta0
SFX g eit anās   [z]eit  is:3xta0
SFX g eit anamēs [z]eit  is:1dta0
SFX g eit anatēs [z]eit  is:2dta0
SFX g it  nitēs  [z]eit  is:2dtap
SFX g t   tūs    [z]eit  is:0dtav
SFX g eit anūtīs [z]eit  is:0xtaa
SFX g t  dūs   ūt  is:1vta0
SFX g t  dīs   ūt  is:0xta0
SFX g t  dās   ūt  is:0xta0
SFX g t  damēs ūt  is:1dta0
SFX g t  datēs ūt  is:2dta0
SFX g t  ditēs ūt  is:2dtap
SFX g t  tūs   ūt  is:0dtav
SFX g t  dūtīs ūt  is:0xtaa
SFX g ēt  iejūs   ēt  is:1vta0
SFX g t   jīs     ēt  is:2vta0
SFX g ēt  iejās   ēt  is:3xta0
SFX g ēt  iejamēs ēt  is:1dta0
SFX g ēt  iejatēs ēt  is:2dta0
SFX g ēt  iejitēs ēt  is:2dtap
SFX g ēt  ātūs    ēt  is:0dtav
SFX g ēt  iejūtīs ēt  is:0xtaa
SFX g imt  amūs   imt  is:1vta0
SFX g imt  amīs   imt  is:2vta0
SFX g imt  emās   imt  is:3xta0
SFX g imt  emamēs imt  is:1dta0
SFX g imt  ematēs imt  is:2dta0
SFX g imt  emitēs imt  is:2dtap
SFX g t    tūs    imt  is:0dtav
SFX g imt  emūtīs imt  is:0xtaa
